Illinois, session 104th, HB5425.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Natural Organic Reduction Regulation Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative intent. The practice of natural 7organic reduction in the State is declared to be a practice 8affecting the public health, safety, and welfare and subject 9to regulation and control in the public interest. It is 10further declared to be a matter of public interest and concern 11that the preparation, care, and final disposition of a 12deceased human body be attended with appropriate observance 13and understanding, having due regard and respect for the 14reverent care of the human body and for those bereaved and for 15the overall spiritual dignity of the human. It is further a 16matter of public interest that the practice of natural organic 17reduction, as defined in this Act, be done only by qualified 18persons authorized by this Act. This Act shall be liberally 19construed to best carry out these subjects and purposes. 20    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 21    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 22by the Comptroller in the applicant's or licensee's   HB5425 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1application file or license file. The address of record shall 2be the permanent street address of the natural organic 3reduction facility.4    "Alternative container" means a receptacle or 5biodegradable external wrapping, other than a casket, in which 6human remains are transported to the natural organic reduction 7facility. An alternative container shall be: (i) able to be 8closed in order to provide a complete covering for the human 9remains; (ii) resistant to leakage or spillage; (iii) rigid 10enough for handling with ease; and (iv) able to provide 11protection for the health, safety, and personal integrity of 12the natural organic reduction facilities personnel. 13    "Authorizing agent" means a person legally entitled to 14order the natural organic reduction and final disposition of 15specific human remains.16    "Body parts" means limbs or other portions of the anatomy 17that are removed from a person or human remains for medical 18purposes during treatment, surgery, biopsy, autopsy, or 19medical research or human bodies or any portion of human 20bodies that have been donated to science for medical research 21purposes. 22    "Burial transit permit" means a permit for disposition of 23a dead human body as required by State law. 24    "Casket" means a container that is designed for the 25encasement of human remains that is usually constructed of 26wood, metal, or like material and ornamented and lined with   HB5425 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1fabric, and may or may not be combustible. 2    "Comptroller" means the Comptroller of the State. 3    "Disposition authority" means the legal entity which is 4licensed by the Comptroller to operate a natural organic 5reduction facility and to perform natural organic reductions. 6    "Final disposition" means the burial, cremation, natural 7organic reduction, or other disposition of human remains or 8parts of human remains. 9    "Funeral director" means a person known by the title of 10"funeral director", "funeral director and embalmer", or other 11similar words or titles and licensed by the State to practice 12funeral directing or funeral directing and embalming. 13    "Funeral establishment" means a building or separate 14portion of a building that has a specific street address and 15location and that is devoted to activities relating to the 16shelter, care, custody, and preparation of a deceased human 17body. A funeral establishment may contain facilities for 18funeral or wake services.19    "Holding facility" means an area that: (i) is designated 20for the retention of human remains prior to natural organic 21reduction; (ii) complies with all applicable public health 22law; (iii) preserves the health and safety of the natural 23organic reduction facilities personnel; and (iv) is secure 24from access by anyone other than authorized persons. A holding 25facility may be located in the natural organic reduction room, 26consistent with the refrigeration requirements of this Act.   HB5425 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    "Human remains" means the body of a deceased person, 2including any form of body prosthesis that has been 3permanently attached or implanted in the body. 4    "Integrate into the soil" means the authorized addition 5and mixing of reduced human remains with existing soil in a 6defined area within a dedicated cemetery, conservation area, 7or property where the person who has control over the 8disposition of the reduced human remains has obtained written 9permission of the property owner. 10    "Licensee" means an entity licensed under this Act. An 11entity that holds itself as a licensee or that is accused of 12unlicensed practice is considered a licensee for purposes of 13enforcement, investigation, hearings, and the Illinois 14Administrative Procedure Act. 15    "Natural organic reduction" means the process of 16transforming a human body into soil using the natural 17decomposition process, accelerated with the addition of 18organic materials through the following steps: 19        (1) The body of a deceased person is mixed together 20    with natural materials and air, eventually resulting in 21    the body's reduction to a soil material. 22        (2) Large tanks, containers, or similar vessels hold 23    human remains together with straw, wood chips, or other 24    natural materials until the process is complete. Any such 25    tank, container, or similar vessel shall be stainless 26    steel, leakproof, promote aerobic reduction, and provide   HB5425 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    for continuous monitoring of the natural organic reduction 2    process.3        (3) The processing of the remains after removal from 4    the reduction chamber. 5    "Natural organic reduction authorization" means the 6natural organic reduction form authorizing a natural organic 7reduction which is signed by the next of kin or authorizing 8agent. This natural organic reduction form must be a separate 9document and cannot be a part of another form or document. 10    "Natural organic reduction facility" means the building or 11portions of a building that houses the natural organic 12reduction room and the holding facility. The facility shall 13have a ventilation system that ventilates from the tank, 14container, or similar vessel to a biofiltration system.15    "Natural organic reduction room" means the room in which 16the reduction chambers are located. 17    "Niche" means a compartment or cubicle for the 18memorialization and permanent placement of an urn containing 19reduced remains. 20    "Person" means any person, partnership, association, 21corporation, limited liability company, or other entity, and 22in the case of such a business organization, its officers, 23partners, members, or shareholders possessing 25% or more of 24ownership of the entity. 25    "Processing" means the removal of foreign objects as well 26as, but not limited to, grinding, crushing, and pulverizing of   HB5425 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1the remaining teeth and bones for the reduced human remains to 2be integrated into the soil. 3    "Pulverization" means the reduction of identifiable bone 4fragments after the completion of the natural organic 5reduction process to granulated particles by manual or 6mechanical means. 7    "Reduction chamber" means the enclosed space within which 8individual human remains are reduced and any other attached, 9non-enclosed mechanical components that are necessary for the 10safe and proper functioning of the equipment. A reduction 11chamber shall reach a minimum of 131 degrees Fahrenheit for 72 12consecutive hours. 13    "Reduced human remains" means the remains of a human body 14that have been reduced to soil through a process of reduction. 15"Reduced human remains" does not include foreign materials, 16pacemakers, or prostheses. 17    "Reduced human remains interment container" means a rigid 18outer container that is subject to a cemetery's rules and 19regulations. 20    "Scattering area" means an area which may be designated by 21a cemetery and located on dedicated cemetery property, or an 22area designated as a scattering area on private land or a 23privately owned nature preserve, where reduced human remains, 24which have been removed from the reduced human remains 25interment container, can be mixed with, or placed on top of, 26the soil or ground cover.   HB5425 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    "Temporary container" means a receptacle for reduced human 2remains, usually composed of cardboard, plastic, or similar 3material, that can be closed in a manner that prevents the 4leakage or spillage of the reduced human remains and the 5entrance of foreign material and that is a single container of 6sufficient size to hold the reduced human remains until an urn 7is acquired or the reduced human remains are scattered. 8    "Urn" means a receptacle designed to encase a portion of 9the reduced human remains.  10    Section 15. Powers and duties of the Comptroller. Subject 11to the provisions of this Act, the Comptroller may exercise 12any of the following powers and duties: 13        (1) authorize standards to ascertain the 14    qualifications and fitness of applicants for licensing as 15    licensed natural organic reduction authorities and pass 16    upon the qualifications of applicants for licensure; 17        (2) examine and audit a licensed disposition 18    authority's record, a natural organic reduction facility, 19    or any other aspects of the natural organic reduction 20    operations as the Comptroller deems appropriate; 21        (3) investigate any and all unlicensed activity; 22        (4) conduct hearings on proceedings to refuse to issue 23    licenses or to revoke, suspend, place on probation, 24    reprimand, or otherwise discipline licensees and to refuse 25    to issue licenses or to revoke, suspend, place on   HB5425 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    probation, reprimand, or otherwise discipline licensees; 2        (5) formulate rules required for the administration of 3    this Act; and 4        (6) maintain rosters of the names and addresses of all 5    licensees and all entities whose licenses have been 6    suspended, revoked, or otherwise disciplined. These 7    rosters shall be available upon written request and 8    payment of the required fee.  9    Section 20. Establishment of a natural organic reduction 10facility and licensing of a disposition authority. 11    (a) Any person doing business in this State, or any 12cemetery, crematory, funeral establishment, corporation, 13partnership, joint venture, voluntary organization, or any 14other entity, may erect, maintain, and operate a natural 15organic reduction facility in this State and provide the 16necessary appliances and facilities for the natural organic 17reduction of human remains in accordance with this Act. 18    (b) A natural organic reduction facility shall be subject 19to all local, State, and federal health and environmental 20protection requirements and shall obtain all necessary 21licenses and permits from the Department of Financial and 22Professional Regulation, the Department of Public Health, the 23federal Department of Health and Human Services, and the State 24and federal Environmental Protection Agencies, or other 25appropriate local, State, or federal agencies.   HB5425 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    (c) A natural organic reduction facility may be 2constructed on or adjacent to any cemetery or crematory, on or 3adjacent to any funeral establishment, or at any other 4location consistent with local zoning regulations. 5    (d) An application for licensure as a disposition 6authority shall be in writing on forms furnished by the 7Comptroller. Applications shall be accompanied by a fee of 8$100 and shall contain all of the following: 9        (1) the full name and address, both residential and 10    business, of the applicant if the applicant is an 11    individual; the full name and address of every member if 12    the applicant is a partnership; the full name and address 13    of every member of the board of directors if the applicant 14    is an association; and the name and address of every 15    officer, director, and shareholder holding more than 25% 16    of the corporate stock if the applicant is a corporation; 17        (2) the address and location of the natural organic 18    reduction facility; 19        (3) a description of the type of structure, equipment, 20    and technical process to be used in the operation of the 21    natural organic reduction facility; and 22        (4) any further information that the Comptroller 23    reasonably may require. 24    (e) Each disposition authority shall file an annual report 25with the Comptroller, accompanied with a $25 fee plus $5 for 26each natural organic reduction performed that calendar year,   HB5425 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1providing (i) an affidavit signed by the owner of the natural 2organic reduction facility that at the time of the report the 3natural organic reduction device was in proper operating 4condition and all annual recommended maintenance by the 5manufacturer was performed, (ii) the total number of all 6natural organic reductions performed at the natural organic 7reduction facility during the past year, (iii) attestation by 8the licensee that all applicable permits and certifications 9are valid, (iv) either (A) any changes required in the 10information provided under subsection (d) or (B) an indication 11that no changes have occurred, and (v) any other information 12that the Comptroller may require. The annual report shall be 13filed by a disposition authority on or before March 15 of each 14calendar year. If the fiscal year of a disposition authority 15is not on a calendar year basis, then the disposition 16authority shall file the report required by this Section 17within 75 days after the end of its fiscal year. If a 18disposition authority fails to submit an annual report to the 19Comptroller within the time specified in this Section, the 20Comptroller shall impose upon a disposition authority a 21penalty of $5 for each and every day the disposition authority 22remains delinquent in submitting the annual report. The 23Comptroller may abate all or part of the $5 daily penalty for 24good cause shown. The $25 annual report fee shall be deposited 25into the Comptroller's Administrative Fund. The $5 fee for 26each natural organic reduction performed shall be deposited   HB5425 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1into the Cemetery Consumer Protection Fund.2    (f) All records required to be maintained under this Act, 3including, but not limited to, those relating to the license 4and annual report of the disposition authority required to be 5filed under this Section, shall be subject to inspection by 6the Comptroller upon reasonable notice. 7    (g) The Comptroller may inspect a natural organic 8reduction facility record at a licensed disposition 9authority's place of business to review the licensee's 10compliance with this Act. The Comptroller may charge a fee of 11$100 for the inspection to the licensee. The inspection must 12include verification that: 13        (1) the disposition authority has complied with the 14    recordkeeping requirements of this Act; 15        (2) a natural organic reduction device operator's 16    certification of training and the required continuing 17    education certification is conspicuously displayed at the 18    natural organic reduction facility; 19        (3) the disposition authority is in compliance with 20    local zoning requirements; 21        (4) the disposition authority license issued by the 22    Comptroller is conspicuously displayed at the natural 23    organic reduction facility; and 24        (5) other details as determined by rule. 25    (h) Every license issued under this Act shall be renewed 26every 5 years for a renewal fee of $100. The renewal fee shall   HB5425 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1be deposited into the Comptroller's Administrative Fund. The 2Comptroller, upon the request of an interested person or on 3his or her own motion, may issue new licenses to a licensee 4whose license or licenses have been revoked, if no factor or 5condition then exists which would have warranted the 6Comptroller to originally refuse the issuance of the license.  7    Section 25. Grounds for denial or discipline. 8    (a) In this Section, "applicant" means a person who has 9applied for a license under this Act, including those persons 10whose names are listed on a license application in Section 20 11of this Act. 12    (b) The Comptroller may refuse to issue a license, place 13on probation, reprimand, or take other disciplinary action 14that the Comptroller may deem appropriate, including imposing 15fines not to exceed $5,000 for each violation, with regard to 16any license under this Act, or may suspend or revoke a license 17issued under this Act, on any of the following grounds: 18        (1) The applicant or licensee has made any 19    misrepresentation or false statement or concealed any 20    material fact in furnishing information to the 21    Comptroller. 22        (2) The applicant or licensee has been engaged in 23    fraudulent business practices. 24        (3) The applicant or licensee has refused to give 25    information required under this Act to be disclosed to the   HB5425 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    Comptroller or fails, within 30 days, to provide 2    information in response to a written request made by the 3    Comptroller. 4        (4) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 5    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 6    defraud, or harm the public. 7        (5) For any individual listed in the license 8    application as required under Section 20, that individual 9    has conducted or is about to conduct any natural organic 10    reduction business on behalf of the applicant in a 11    fraudulent manner or has been convicted of any felony or 12    misdemeanor an essential element of which is fraud. 13        (6) The applicant or licensee has failed to make the 14    annual report required by this Act or to comply with a 15    final order, decision, or finding of the Comptroller made 16    under this Act. 17        (7) The applicant or licensee, including any member, 18    officer, or director of the applicant or licensee if the 19    applicant or licensee is a firm, partnership, association, 20    or corporation and any shareholder holding more than 25% 21    of the corporate stock of the applicant or licensee, has 22    violated any provision of this Act or any regulation or 23    order made by the Comptroller under this Act. 24        (8) The Comptroller finds any fact or condition 25    existing that, if it had existed at the time of the 26    original application for a license under this Act, would   HB5425 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    have warranted the Comptroller refusing the issuance of 2    the license. 3        (9) Any violation of this Act or of the rules adopted 4    under this Act. 5        (10) Incompetence. 6        (11) Gross malpractice. 7        (12) Discipline by another state, District of 8    Columbia, territory, or foreign nation, if at least one of 9    the grounds for the discipline is the same or 10    substantially equivalent to those set forth in this 11    Section. 12        (13) Directly or indirectly giving to or receiving 13    from any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or 14    association any fee, commission, rebate, or other form of 15    compensation for professional services not actually or 16    personally rendered. 17        (14) A finding by the Comptroller that the licensee, 18    after having its license placed on probationary status, 19    has violated the terms of probation. 20        (15) Willfully making or filing false records or 21    reports, including, but not limited to, false records 22    filed with State agencies or departments. 23        (16) Gross, willful, or continued overcharging for 24    professional services, including filing false statements 25    for collection of fees for which services are not 26    rendered.   HB5425 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1        (17) Practicing under a false or, except as provided 2    by law, an assumed name. 3        (18) Cheating on or attempting to subvert this Act's 4    licensing application process.  5    Section 30. License revocation or suspension; surrender of 6license. Upon the revocation or suspension of a license issued 7under this Act, the licensee must immediately surrender the 8license to the Comptroller. If the licensee fails to do so, the 9Comptroller may seize the license.  10    Section 35. Surrender of license; effect on licensee's 11liability. A licensee may surrender a license issued under 12this Act by delivering to the Comptroller a written notice 13stating that the licensee thereby surrenders the license, but 14such a surrender does not affect the licensee's civil or 15criminal liability for acts committed before the surrender. 16    Section 40. License; display; transfer; duration. 17    (a) Every license issued under this Act must state the 18number of the license, the business name and address of the 19licensee's principal place of business, and the licensee's 20parent company, if any. The license must be conspicuously 21posted in the place of business operating under the license. 22    (b) After initial licensure, if any person comes to obtain 23at least 51% of the ownership over the natural organic   HB5425 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1reduction facility, then the disposition authority shall apply 2for a new license in the required time as set out by rule. 3    (c) Every license issued under this Act shall remain in 4force until it has been surrendered, suspended, or revoked in 5accordance with this Act. Upon the request of an interested 6person or on the Comptroller's own motion, the Comptroller may 7issue a new license to a licensee whose license has been 8revoked under this Act if no factor or condition then exists 9which would have warranted the Comptroller in originally 10refusing the issuance of the license.  11    Section 45. Authorizing agent. The priority of the person 12or persons who have the right to serve as the authorizing agent 13for natural organic reduction is in the same priority as 14listed in Section 5 of the Disposition of Remains Act. 15    Section 50. Natural organic reduction only in a natural 16organic reduction facility. An individual or a person, 17cemetery, crematory, funeral establishment, corporation, 18partnership, joint venture, voluntary organization, or other 19entity may reduce human remains only in a natural organic 20reduction facility operated by a disposition authority 21licensed for this purpose and only under the limitations 22provided in this Act. 23    Section 55. Authorization for natural organic reduction.   HB5425 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    (a) A disposition authority shall not reduce human remains 2by natural organic reduction until it has received all of the 3following: 4        (1) a natural organic reduction authorization form 5    signed by the authorizing agent. The natural organic 6    reduction authorization form shall be provided by the 7    disposition authority and shall contain, at a minimum, the 8    following information: 9            (A) the identity of the human remains and the time 10        and date of death; 11            (B) the name of the funeral director and funeral 12        establishment, if applicable, that obtained the 13        natural organic reduction authorization; 14            (C) notification as to whether the death occurred 15        from a disease declared by the Department of Public 16        Health to be infectious, contagious, communicable, or 17        dangerous to the public health, whether the deceased 18        was treated with nuclear medicine, and whether any of 19        the following apply:20                (i) a prion disease infection, mycobacterium 21            tuberculosis infection, or Ebola virus disease 22            infection;23                (ii) a contagious disease infection which may 24            be a public health hazard as identified by the 25            local health officer or medical examiner;26                (iii) a radioactive seed implant within 30   HB5425 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1            days of death until such time that 30 days have 2            elapsed or the organ containing the seed or seeds 3            has been removed;4                (iv) containing a nuclear pacemaker until such 5            time that the nuclear pacemaker is removed; or6                (v) perishing as a result of a radiologic 7            incident or accident, unless a written release is 8            provided by the Illinois Emergency Management 9            Agency and Office of Homeland Security or other 10            State or federal agency in charge of the response 11            to the radiological incident or accident.12            (D) the name of the authorizing agent and the 13        relationship between the authorizing agent and the 14        decedent; 15            (E) a representation that the authorizing agent 16        does in fact have the right to authorize the natural 17        organic reduction of the decedent and that the 18        authorizing agent is not aware of any living person 19        who has a superior priority right to that of the 20        authorizing agent, as set forth in Section 45. In the 21        event there is another living person who has a 22        superior priority right to that of the authorizing 23        agent, the form shall contain a representation that 24        the authorizing agent has made all reasonable efforts 25        to contact that person, has been unable to do so, and 26        has no reason to believe that the person would object   HB5425 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1        to the natural organic reduction of the decedent; 2            (F) authorization for the disposition authority to 3        reduce the human remains by natural organic reduction; 4            (G) a representation that the human remains do not 5        contain any other material or implant that may be 6        potentially hazardous or cause damage to the natural 7        organic reduction chamber or the person performing the 8        natural organic reduction; 9            (H) the name of the person authorized to receive 10        the reduced remains from the disposition authority;11            (I) the manner in which final disposition of the 12        reduced human remains is to take place, if known. If 13        the reduction authorization form does not specify 14        final disposition in a grave, crypt, niche, or 15        scattering area, then the form may indicate that the 16        reduced human remains will be held by the disposition 17        authority for 30 days before they are released, unless 18        they are picked up from the disposition authority 19        prior to that time, in person, by the authorizing 20        agent with prior consent from the authorizing agent. 21        At the end of the 60 days, the disposition authority 22        may return the reduced human remains to the 23        authorizing agent if no final disposition arrangements 24        are made; or, at the end of 60 days, the disposition 25        authority may dispose of the reduced human remains in 26        accordance with subsection (e) of Section 75;   HB5425 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1            (J) a listing of any items of value to be delivered 2        to the disposition authority along with the human 3        remains and instructions as to how the items should be 4        handled; 5            (K) a specific statement as to whether the 6        authorizing agent has made arrangements for any type 7        of viewing of the decedent before natural organic 8        reduction or for a service with the decedent present 9        before natural organic reduction in connection with 10        the natural organic reduction and, if so, the date and 11        time of the viewing or service and whether the 12        disposition authority is authorized to proceed with 13        the natural organic reduction upon receipt of the 14        human remains; 15            (L) the signature of the authorizing agent, 16        attesting to the accuracy of all representations 17        contained on the natural organic reduction 18        authorization form, except as set forth in paragraph 19        (M) of this subsection; 20            (M) if a natural organic reduction form is being 21        executed on a preneed basis, the natural organic 22        reduction authorization form shall contain the 23        disclosure required by subsection (b) of Section 125; 24        and25            (N) the natural organic reduction authorization 26        form, other than a preneed natural organic reduction   HB5425 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1        form, shall also be signed by a funeral director or 2        other representative of the disposition authority that 3        obtained the natural organic reduction authorization. 4        That individual shall merely execute the natural 5        organic reduction authorization form and shall not be 6        responsible for any of the representations made by the 7        authorizing agent, unless the individual has actual 8        knowledge to the contrary. The information requested 9        by subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (G) of this 10        subsection, however, shall be considered to be 11        representations of the authorizing agent. The funeral 12        director or funeral establishment shall warrant to the 13        natural organic reduction facility that the human 14        remains delivered to the disposition authority are the 15        human remains identified on the natural organic 16        reduction authorization form;17        (2) a completed and executed burial transit permit 18    indicating that the human remains are to be reduced; and 19        (3) any other documentation required by this State. 20    (b) If an authorizing agent is not available to execute a 21natural organic reduction authorization form in person, that 22person may use an electronic signature. The disposition 23authority, funeral director, and funeral establishment shall 24be entitled to rely upon the natural organic reduction 25authorization form without liability. 26    (c) An authorizing agent who signs a natural organic   HB5425 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1reduction authorization form shall be deemed to warrant the 2truthfulness of any facts set forth on the natural organic 3reduction authorization form, including that person's 4authority to order the natural organic reduction, except for 5the information required by subparagraphs (C) and (G) of 6paragraph (1) of subsection (a), unless the authorizing agent 7has actual knowledge to the contrary. An authorizing agent 8signing a natural organic reduction authorization form shall 9be personally and individually liable for all damages 10occasioned by and resulting from authorizing the natural 11organic reduction. 12    (d) After an authorizing agent has executed a natural 13organic reduction authorization form and before the natural 14organic reduction process has started, the authorizing agent 15may revoke the authorization and instruct the disposition 16authority to cancel the natural organic reduction and to 17release or deliver the human remains to another disposition 18authority or funeral establishment. The instructions shall be 19provided to the disposition authority in writing. A 20disposition authority shall honor any instructions given to it 21by an authorizing agent under this Section if it receives the 22instructions prior to beginning the reduction of the human 23remains.  24    Section 60. Performance of natural organic reduction 25services; training. The handling of the human remains upon   HB5425 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1arrival at a disposition authority, including placement into 2the natural organic reduction chamber, and until the reduction 3inside the chamber is complete shall be under the immediate 4direct supervision of a licensed funeral director or licensed 5funeral director and embalmer. Natural organic reduction 6operators who have received training and received 7certification by a program recognized by the Comptroller may 8handle remains after completed reduction, including 9processing, pulverization, and placement of soil into an urn. 10The disposition authority must conspicuously display the 11certification at the disposition authority's place of 12business. A continuing education natural organic reduction 13course of at least 2 hours in length from a recognized provider 14must be completed every 5 years by each person performing a 15natural organic reduction service. For the purposes of this 16Act, the Comptroller may recognize any training program that 17provides training in the operation of a natural organic 18reduction device, in the maintenance of a clean facility, and 19in the proper handling of human remains. The Comptroller may 20recognize any course that is conducted by a death care trade 21association in the State or the United States for natural 22organic reduction or by a manufacturer of a natural organic 23reduction unit that is consistent with the standards provided 24in this Act or as otherwise determined by rule. 25    Section 65. Recordkeeping.   HB5425 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    (a) The disposition authority shall furnish to the funeral 2director a receipt signed at the time of delivery by both the 3disposition authority and the funeral director who oversaw the 4delivery of the human remains, showing the date and time of the 5delivery, the type of alternative container or external 6wrapping that was delivered, the name of the person from whom 7the human remains were received and the name of the funeral 8establishment or other entity with whom the person is 9affiliated, the name of the person who received the human 10remains on behalf of the disposition authority, and the name 11of the decedent. The disposition authority shall retain a copy 12of this receipt in its permanent records. 13    (b) Upon its release of the reduced human remains, the 14disposition authority shall furnish to the person who receives 15the reduced human remains from the disposition authority a 16receipt signed by both the disposition authority and the 17person who receives the natural organic reduction remains 18showing the date and time of the release, the name of the 19person to whom the reduced human remains were released and the 20name of the funeral establishment, cemetery, or other entity 21with whom the person is affiliated, the name of the person who 22released the reduced human remains on behalf of the 23disposition authority, the name of the decedent, and the 24estimated volume of reduced human remains. The natural organic 25reduction facility shall retain a copy of this receipt in its 26permanent records.   HB5425 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    (c) A disposition authority shall maintain at its place of 2business a permanent record of each natural organic reduction 3that took place at its facility, which shall contain the name 4of the decedent, the date of the natural organic reduction, 5the estimated weight of the reduced human remains, and the 6final disposition of the reduced human remains. 7    (d) The disposition authority shall maintain a record of 8all reduced human remains disposed of by the disposition 9authority in accordance with subsection (d) of Section 75. 10    (e) Upon completion of the natural organic reduction, the 11disposition authority shall file the burial transit permit, as 12required by the Vital Records Act and rules adopted under that 13Act and the Counties Code, and transmit a photocopy of the 14burial transit permit along with the reduced human remains to 15whoever receives the reduced human remains from the 16authorizing agent unless the reduced human remains are to be 17interred, entombed, inurned, or placed in a scattering area, 18in which case the disposition authority shall retain a copy of 19the burial transit permit and shall send the permit, along 20with the reduced human remains, to the cemetery, which shall 21file the permit with the designated agency after the 22interment, entombment, inurnment, or scattering has taken 23place. 24    (f) All cemeteries shall maintain a record of all reduced 25human remains that are disposed of on their property, provided 26that the reduced human remains were properly transferred to   HB5425 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1the cemetery and the cemetery issued a receipt acknowledging 2the transfer of the reduced human remains.  3    Section 70. Natural organic reduction procedures. 4    (a) Human remains shall not be reduced within 24 hours 5after the time of death, as indicated on the Medical 6Examiner's or Coroner's Certificate of Death. In any death, 7the human remains shall not be reduced by the disposition 8authority until a natural organic reduction permit has been 9received from the coroner or medical examiner of the county in 10which the death occurred and the disposition authority has 11received a natural organic reduction authorization form, 12executed by an authorizing agent, in accordance with the 13provisions of Section 55 of this Act. In no instance, however, 14shall the lapse of time between the death and the natural 15organic reduction be less than 24 hours, unless the lapse of 16time is because of a religious requirement. 17    (b) Except as set forth in subsection (a), a disposition 18authority shall have the right to schedule the natural organic 19reduction to be performed at its own convenience, at any time 20after the human remains have been delivered to the disposition 21authority, unless the disposition authority has received 22specific instructions to the contrary on the natural organic 23reduction authorization form. 24    (c) No disposition authority shall reduce human remains 25when it has actual knowledge that human remains contain   HB5425 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1materials or implants that may be potentially hazardous to the 2person performing the natural organic reduction. 3    (d) No disposition authority shall accept embalmed remains 4or remains that were treated with nuclear medicine for natural 5organic reduction. No disposition authority should reduce 6human remains if the human remains are confirmed to have or 7suspected of having one or more of the following conditions:8        (1) a prion disease infection, mycobacterium 9    tuberculosis infection, or Ebola virus disease infection; 10        (2) a contagious disease infection which may be a 11    public health hazard as identified by the Department of 12    Public Health, local health officer, or medical examiner;13        (3) a radioactive seed implant within 30 days of death 14    until such time that 30 days have elapsed or the organ 15    containing the seed or seeds has been removed; 16        (4) containing a nuclear pacemaker until such time 17    that the nuclear pacemaker is removed; 18        (5) perishing as a result of a radiologic incident or 19    accident, unless a written release is provided by the 20    Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 21    Homeland Security or other State or federal agency in 22    charge of the response to the radiological incident or 23    accident; or24        (6) embalmed.25    (e) Whenever a disposition authority is unable or 26unauthorized to reduce human remains immediately upon taking   HB5425 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1custody of the remains, the disposition authority shall place 2the human remains in an operable refrigeration unit with 3cleanable, noncorrosive interior and exterior finishes. The 4unit must be capable of maintaining a temperature of less than 540 degrees Fahrenheit or below and of holding at least 3 6bodies. The disposition authority must notify the authorizing 7agent of the reasons for delay in the natural organic 8reduction if a properly authorized natural organic reduction 9is not performed within any time period expressly contemplated 10in the authorization.11    For purposes of this Section, "immediately upon taking 12custody" means within 24 hours of taking custody.13    (f) A disposition authority shall not accept an 14alternative container or external wrapping from which there is 15any evidence of the leakage of body fluids. 16    (g) A disposition authority shall not reduce the remains 17of more than one person at the same time and in the same 18reduction chamber or introduce the remains of a second person 19into the reduction chamber until the reduction of preceding 20remains has been terminated and reasonable efforts have been 21employed to remove all fragments of preceding remains. The 22fact that there is residue in the reduction chamber or other 23equipment or a container used in a prior reduction does not 24violate this Section. 25    (h) No unauthorized person shall be permitted in the 26holding facility or natural organic reduction room while any   HB5425 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1human remains are being held there awaiting natural organic 2reduction, being reduced, or being removed from the reduction 3chamber. 4    (i) A disposition authority shall not remove any dental 5gold, body parts, organs, or any item of value prior to or 6subsequent to a natural organic reduction without previously 7having received specific written authorization from the 8authorizing agent and written instructions for the delivery of 9these items to the authorizing agent. Under no circumstances 10shall a disposition authority profit from removing or 11assisting in any removal of valuables. 12    (j) In instances when the remains of deceased human beings 13are to be delivered to a natural organic reduction facility in 14a casket that is not to be organically reduced with the 15deceased, timely disclosure thereof must be made by the person 16making the funeral arrangements to the natural organic 17reduction facility that prior to the natural organic reduction 18the remains of the deceased human being shall be transferred 19to an alternative container. The signed acknowledgment of the 20authorizing person that the timely disclosure has been made 21shall be retained by the natural organic reduction facility in 22its permanent records. 23    (k) A disposition authority shall:24        (1) ensure that the material in the natural organic 25    reduction chamber naturally reaches and maintains a 26    minimum temperature of 131 degrees Fahrenheit for a   HB5425 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    minimum of 72 consecutive hours during the process of 2    natural organic reduction; 3        (2) analyze each instance of the reduced human remains 4    for physical contaminants, including, but not limited to, 5    intact bone, dental fillings, and medical implants, and 6    ensure reduced human remains have less than 0.01 mg/kg dry 7    weight of any physical contaminants;8        (3) collect material samples for analysis that are 9    representative of each instance of natural organic 10    reduction, using a sampling method such as those described 11    in the U.S. Composting Council 2002 Test Methods for the 12    Examination of Composting and Compost, method 02.01-A 13    through E; 14        (4) develop and use a natural organic reduction 15    process in which the reduced human remains from the 16    process do not exceed the following limits: 1718Metals and other testing 19parameters Limit (mg/kg dry weight), unless otherwise specified20Fecal coliform2122Less than 1,000 Most total Probable Number per gram of solids (dry weight) 23Salmonella2425Less than 3 Most Probable Number per 4 grams of total solids (dry weight)  HB5425 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1ArsenicLess than or equal to 11 ppm2CadmiumLess than or equal to 7.1 ppm3LeadLess than or equal to 150 ppm4MercuryLess than or equal to 5 ppm5SeleniumLess than or equal to 18 ppm; 6        (5) analyze, using a third-party laboratory accredited 7    by the Illinois Environmental Laboratory Accreditation 8    Program or an STA Compost-Certified Laboratory, the 9    natural organic reduction facility's material samples of 10    reduced human remains according to the following schedule:11            (A) the natural organic reduction facility must 12        analyze each of the first 20 instances of reduced 13        human remains for the parameters in paragraph (4) of 14        this subsection (k);15            (B) if any of the first 20 instances of reduced 16        human remains yield results exceeding the limits in 17        paragraph (4) of this subsection (k), the natural 18        organic reduction facility must conduct appropriate 19        processes to correct the levels of the substances in 20        paragraph (4) and have the resultant remains tested to 21        ensure they fall within the identified limits;22            (C) if any of the first 20 instances of reduced 23        human remains yield results exceeding the limits in 24        paragraph (4) of this subsection (k), the natural 25        organic reduction facility must analyze each   HB5425 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1        additional instance of reduced human remains for the 2        parameters in paragraph (4) until a total of 20 3        samples, not including those from remains that were 4        reprocessed as required in subparagraph (B) of this 5        paragraph (5), have yielded results within the limits 6        in paragraph (4) on initial testing;7            (D) after 20 material samples of reduced human 8        remains have met the limits in paragraph (4) of this 9        subsection (k), the natural organic reduction facility 10        must analyze at least 25% of the natural organic 11        reduction facility's monthly instances of reduced 12        human remains for the parameters in paragraph (4) 13        until 80 total material samples of reduced remains are 14        found to meet the limits in paragraph (4), not 15        including any samples that required reprocessing to 16        meet those limits; and17            (E) after 80 material samples of reduced human 18        remains are found to meet the limits in paragraph (4) 19        of this subsection (k), the natural organic reduction 20        facility must analyze at least one randomly chosen 21        instance of reduced human remains each month for the 22        parameters in paragraph (4). If fecal coliform or 23        salmonella in the tested reduced human remains exceeds 24        the limit for that substance in paragraph (4), the 25        natural organic reduction facility must analyze each 26        subsequent instance of reduced human remains for fecal   HB5425 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1        coliform or salmonella until 10 total material samples 2        are found to meet the limits for those substances in 3        paragraph (4) on initial testing, demonstrating the 4        natural organic reduction process was effectively 5        corrected;6        (6) comply with any testing requirements established 7    by the Comptroller or local health department for content 8    parameters in addition to those specified in paragraph (4) 9    of this subsection (k);10        (7) not release any reduced human remains that exceed 11    the limits in paragraph (4) of this subsection (k); and12        (8) prepare, maintain, and provide to the Comptroller 13    a report for each calendar year detailing the natural 14    organic reduction facility's activities during the 15    previous calendar year. The report must include the 16    following information:17            (A) the name and address of the natural organic 18        reduction facility;19            (B) the calendar year covered by the report;20            (C) the annual quantity of reduced human remains;21            (D) the results of any laboratory analyses of 22        reduced human remains, including an affirmation that 23        the analysis was prepared in accordance with this 24        subsection (k); and25            (E) any additional information required by the 26        Comptroller, Department of Public Health, or local   HB5425 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1        health department.2    (l) Upon the completion of each natural organic reduction, 3all of the recoverable residue of the reduction process shall 4be removed from the reduction chamber. 5    (m) If all of the recovered reduced human remains will not 6fit within the receptacle that has been selected, the 7remainder of the reduced human remains shall be disposed of in 8accordance with subsection (e) of Section 75. 9    (n) A disposition authority shall not knowingly represent 10to an authorizing agent or the agent's designee that a 11temporary container or urn contains the reduced remains of a 12specific decedent when it does not. 13    (o) Reduced human remains shall be shipped only by a 14method that has an internal tracing system available and that 15provides a receipt signed by the person accepting delivery. 16    (p) A disposition authority shall maintain an 17identification system that shall ensure that it shall be able 18to identify the human remains in its possession throughout all 19phases of the natural organic reduction process. 20    (q) A disposition authority shall not reduce via natural 21organic reduction the remains as specified in Section 55.22    (r) In the case of an event where the health of the public 23may be at risk or there are signs at a facility of a potential 24health hazard, the Department of Public Health may be 25consulted to assess the natural organic reduction facility's 26compliance with this Act.   HB5425 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    Section 75. Disposition of reduced human remains. 2    (a) The authorizing agent shall be responsible for the 3final disposition of the reduced human remains delivered to 4the authorizing agent. The reduced human remains delivered to 5the authorizing agent may be disposed of by placing them in a 6grave, crypt, or niche or by scattering them in a scattering 7area. 8    (b) Reduced human remains delivered to the authorizing 9agent may be integrated into the soil in an area where no local 10prohibition exists if the reduced human remains are not 11distinguishable to the public, are not in a container, and 12that the person who has control over disposition of the 13reduced human remains has obtained written permission of the 14property owner or governing agency to integrate into soil on 15the property. 16    (c) A State or local agency may adopt an ordinance, 17regulation, or policy, as appropriate, authorizing or 18specifically prohibiting the integration of reduced human 19remains into the soil on lands under the agency's 20jurisdiction. The integration into the soil of the reduced 21human remains of more than one person in one location pursuant 22to this Section does not create a cemetery. 23    (d) Upon the completion of the natural organic reduction 24process, and except as provided for in subparagraph (I) of 25paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 55, if the   HB5425 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1disposition authority has not been instructed to arrange for 2the interment, entombment, inurnment, or scattering of the 3reduced human remains, the disposition authority shall deliver 4the reduced human remains to the individual specified on the 5natural organic reduction authorization form or, if no 6individual is specified, then to the authorizing agent. Upon 7receipt of the reduced human remains, the individual receiving 8them may transport them in any manner in this State without a 9permit and may dispose of them in accordance with this 10Section.11    (e) If, after a period of 60 days from the date the natural 12organic reduction process is complete, the authorizing agent 13or the agent's designee has not instructed the disposition 14authority to arrange for the final disposition of the reduced 15human remains, claimed the reduced human remains, or claimed 16only a portion of the reduced human remains, the disposition 17authority may dispose of the reduced human remains in a 18cemetery or on conservation land, which is land that is 19protected and cannot be built on and that is only used for the 20conservation of nature. The disposition authority, however, 21shall keep a permanent record identifying the site of final 22disposition and the estimated volume of human remains. The 23authorizing agent shall be responsible for reimbursing the 24disposition authority for all reasonable expenses incurred in 25disposing of the reduced human remains.26    (f) Except with the express written permission of the   HB5425 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1authorizing agent, no person shall: 2        (1) dispose of reduced human remains in a manner or in 3    a location so that the reduced human remains are 4    commingled with those of another person; this prohibition 5    shall not apply to the scattering of reduced remains in an 6    area located in a dedicated cemetery or conservation land, 7    which is land that is protected, cannot be built on, and is 8    only used for the conservation of nature; or 9        (2) place reduced human remains of more than one 10    person in the same temporary container or urn. 11    (g) No person shall sell the soil resulting from reduced 12human remains for commercial purposes. 13    (h) No person shall use the soil resulting from reduced 14human remains to grow food for human or livestock consumption. 15    Section 80. Hazardous implants. If an authorizing agent 16informs the funeral director and the disposition authority on 17the natural organic reduction authorization form of the 18presence of hazardous implants in the human remains, then the 19funeral director shall be responsible for ensuring that all 20necessary steps have been taken to remove the hazardous 21implants before delivering the human remains to the natural 22organic reduction facility for natural organic reduction. If 23the funeral director who delivers the human remains to the 24natural organic reduction facility fails to ensure that the 25hazardous implants have been removed from the human remains   HB5425 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1prior to delivery, and should the human remains be reduced, 2then the funeral director who delivered the human remains to 3the natural organic reduction facility and anyone else covered 4by this Section shall be liable for all resulting damages. The 5funeral director shall bear no liability for any hazardous 6implants or materials present in the human remains that were 7not disclosed by the authorizing agent on the natural organic 8reduction authorization form. 9    Section 85. Penalties. Violations of this Act shall be 10punishable as follows: 11        (1) Performing a natural organic reduction without 12    receipt of a natural organic reduction authorization form 13    signed, in either paper or electronic format, by an 14    authorizing agent shall be a Class 4 felony. 15        (2) Signing, in either paper or electronic format, a 16    natural organic reduction authorization form with the 17    actual knowledge that the form contains false or incorrect 18    information shall be a Class 4 felony. 19        (3) A violation of any natural organic reduction 20    procedure set forth in Section 70 shall be a Class 4 21    felony. 22        (4) Holding oneself out to the public as a disposition 23    authority, or the operation of a building or structure 24    within this State as a natural organic reduction facility, 25    without being licensed under this Act shall be a Class A   HB5425 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    misdemeanor. 2        (5) Performance of natural organic reduction service 3    by a person who has not completed a training program as 4    defined in Section 60 shall be a Class A misdemeanor. 5        (6) Any person who intentionally violates a provision 6    of this Act or a final order of the Comptroller is liable 7    for a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 per violation. 8        (7) Any person who knowingly acts without proper legal 9    authority and who willfully and knowingly destroys or 10    damages the remains of a deceased human being or who 11    desecrates human remains is guilty of a Class 3 felony. 12        (8) A violation of any other provision of this Act 13    shall be a Class B misdemeanor.  14    Section 90. Failure to file annual report. Whenever a 15disposition authority refuses or neglects to file its annual 16report in violation of Section 20 of this Act or fails to 17otherwise comply with the requirements of this Act, the 18Comptroller shall impose a penalty as provided for by rule for 19each and every day the licensee remains delinquent in 20submitting the annual report. The report shall be made under 21oath and shall be in a form determined by the Comptroller. 22    Section 95. Injunctive action; cease and desist order. 23    (a) If any person violates the provisions of this Act, the 24Comptroller, in the name of the People of the State, through   HB5425 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1the Attorney General or the State's Attorney of the county in 2which the violation is alleged to have occurred, may petition 3for an order enjoining the violation or for an order enforcing 4compliance with this Act. Upon the filing of a verified 5petition, the court with appropriate jurisdiction may issue a 6temporary restraining order, without notice or bond, and may 7preliminarily and permanently enjoin the violation. If it is 8established that the person has violated or is violating the 9injunction, the court may punish the offender for contempt of 10court. Proceedings under this Section are in addition to, and 11not in lieu of, all other remedies and penalties provided by 12this Act. 13    (b) Whenever, in the opinion of the Comptroller, a person 14violates any provision of this Act, the Comptroller may issue 15a rule to show cause why an order to cease and desist should 16not be entered against that person. The rule shall clearly set 17forth the grounds relied upon by the Comptroller and shall 18allow at least 7 days from the date of the rule to file an 19answer satisfactory to the Comptroller. Failure to answer to 20the satisfaction of the Comptroller shall cause an order to 21cease and desist to be issued.  22    Section 100. Service of notice. Service by the Comptroller 23of any notice requiring a person to file a statement or report 24under this Act shall be made: (1) personally by delivery of a 25duly executed copy of the notice to the person to be served or,   HB5425 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1if that person is not a natural person, in the manner provided 2in the Civil Practice Article of the Code of Civil Procedure 3when a complaint is filed; or (2) by mailing by certified mail 4a duly executed copy of the notice to the person at his or her 5address of record. 6    Section 105. Investigations; notice and hearing. The 7Comptroller may at any time investigate the actions of any 8applicant or of any person, persons, or entity rendering or 9offering natural organic reduction services or any person or 10entity holding or claiming to hold a license as a licensed 11natural organic reduction facility. The Comptroller shall, 12before revoking, suspending, placing on probation, 13reprimanding, or taking any other disciplinary action under 14Section 25 of this Act, at least 30 days before the date set 15for the hearing: (i) notify the accused in writing of the 16charges made and the time and place for the hearing on the 17charges; (ii) direct the accused applicant or licensee to file 18a written answer to the charges with the Comptroller under 19oath within 20 days after the service on the accused of the 20notice; and (iii) inform the accused that, if the accused 21fails to answer, default will be taken against the accused or 22that the accused's license may be suspended, revoked, placed 23on probationary status, or other disciplinary action with 24regard to the license, including limiting the scope, nature, 25or extent of the accused's practice, as the Comptroller may   HB5425 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1consider proper. 2    At the time and place fixed in the notice, the Comptroller 3shall proceed to hear the charges and the parties, or their 4counsel, shall be accorded ample opportunity to present any 5pertinent statements, testimony, evidence, and arguments. The 6Comptroller shall have the authority to appoint an attorney 7duly licensed to practice law in the State to serve as the 8hearing officer in any disciplinary action with regard to a 9license. The hearing officer shall have full authority to 10conduct the hearing. The Comptroller may continue the hearing 11from time to time. If the person, after receiving the notice, 12fails to file an answer, the person's license may, in the 13discretion of the Comptroller, be suspended, revoked, placed 14on probationary status, or the Comptroller may take whatever 15disciplinary action is considered proper, including limiting 16the scope, nature, or extent of the person's practice or the 17imposition of a fine, without a hearing, if the act or acts 18charged constitute sufficient grounds for that action under 19this Act. The written notice may be served by personal 20delivery or by certified mail to the address specified by the 21accused in the accused's last notification with the 22Comptroller.  23    Section 110. Compelling testimony. Any circuit court, upon 24application of the Comptroller or designated hearing officer, 25may enter an order requiring the attendance of witnesses and   HB5425 Engrossed- 43 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1their testimony and the production of documents, papers, 2files, books, and records in connection with any hearing or 3investigation. The court may compel obedience to its order by 4proceedings for contempt. 5    Section 115. Administrative review; venue; certification 6of record; costs. 7    (a) All final administrative decisions, as defined in 8Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure, of the 9Comptroller are subject to judicial review under the 10Administrative Review Law and its rules.11    (b) Proceedings for judicial review shall be commenced in 12the circuit court of the county in which the party applying for 13review resides, but if the party is not a resident of Illinois, 14the venue shall be in Cook or Sangamon County. 15    (c) The Comptroller shall not be required to certify any 16record of the court, file an answer in court, or to otherwise 17appear in any court in a judicial review proceeding unless and 18until the Comptroller has received from the plaintiff payment 19of the costs of furnishing and certifying the record, which 20costs shall be determined by the Comptroller. Failure on the 21part of the plaintiff to make the payment to the Comptroller is 22grounds for dismissal of the action.  23    Section 120. Preneed of natural organic reduction 24arrangements.   HB5425 Engrossed- 44 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    (a) Any person, or anyone who has legal authority to act on 2behalf of a person, on a preneed basis, may authorize the 3person's own natural organic reduction and the final 4disposition of the person's reduced remains by executing, as 5the authorizing agent, a natural organic reduction 6authorization form. A copy of this form shall be provided to 7the person. Any person shall have the right to transfer or 8cancel this authorization at any time prior to death by 9destroying the executed natural organic reduction 10authorization form and providing written notice to the 11disposition authority named in the preneed form. 12    (b) Any natural organic authorization form that is being 13executed by an individual as the individual's own authorizing 14agent on a preneed basis shall contain the following 15disclosure, which shall be completed by the authorizing agent: 16    "( ) I do not wish to allow any of my survivors the option 17of cancelling my natural organic reduction and selecting 18alternative arrangements, regardless of whether my survivors 19deem a change to be appropriate. 20    ( ) I wish to allow only the survivors whom I have 21designated below the option of cancelling my natural organic 22reduction and selecting alternative arrangements, if they deem 23a change to be appropriate." 24    (c) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Section, 25at the time of the death of a person who has executed, as the 26authorizing agent, a natural organic reduction authorization   HB5425 Engrossed- 45 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1form on a preneed basis, any person in possession of an 2executed form and any person charged with making arrangements 3for the final disposition of the decedent who has knowledge of 4the existence of an executed form shall use the person's best 5efforts to ensure that the decedent is reduced and that the 6final disposition of the reduced human remains is in 7accordance with the instructions contained on the natural 8organic reduction authorization form. If a disposition 9authority (i) is in possession of a completed natural organic 10reduction authorization form that was executed on a preneed 11basis, (ii) is in possession of the designated human remains, 12and (iii) has received payment for the natural organic 13reduction of the human remains and the final disposition of 14the reduced human remains or is otherwise assured of payment, 15then the disposition authority shall be required to reduce the 16human remains and dispose of the reduced human remains 17according to the instructions contained on the natural organic 18reduction authorization form and may do so without any 19liability. 20    (d) Any preneed contract sold by, or preneed arrangements 21made with, a cemetery, funeral establishment, disposition 22authority, or any other party that includes a natural organic 23reduction shall specify the final disposition of the reduced 24human remains, in accordance with Section 75. If no different 25or inconsistent instructions are provided to the disposition 26authority by the authorizing agent at the time of death, the   HB5425 Engrossed- 46 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1disposition authority shall be authorized to release or 2dispose of the reduced human remains as indicated in the 3preneed agreement. Upon compliance with the terms of the 4preneed agreement, the disposition authority shall be 5discharged from any legal obligation concerning the reduced 6human remains. The preneed agreement shall be kept as a 7permanent record by the disposition authority. 8    (e) This Section shall not apply to any natural organic 9reduction authorization form or preneed contract executed 10prior to the effective date of this Act. Any cemetery, funeral 11establishment, disposition authority, or other party, however, 12with the written approval of the authorizing agent or person 13who executed the preneed contract, may designate that the 14natural organic reduction authorization form or preneed 15contract is subject to this Act.  16    Section 125. Employment of funeral director by a 17disposition authority. A disposition authority shall employ or 18enter into a contract with a funeral director for the purpose 19of arranging natural organic reduction on an at-need basis 20with the general public, transporting human remains to the 21natural organic reduction facility, and processing all 22necessary paperwork.  23    Section 130. Scope of Act. This Act shall be construed and 24interpreted as a comprehensive natural organic reduction   HB5425 Engrossed- 47 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1statute, and the provisions of this Act shall take precedence 2over any existing laws containing provisions applicable to 3natural organic reduction but that do not specifically or 4comprehensively address natural organic reduction. 5    Section 135. Record of proceedings; transcript. The 6Comptroller, at its expense, shall preserve a record of all 7proceedings at the formal hearing of any case. Any notice of 8hearing, complaint, other documents in the nature of 9pleadings, written motions filed in the proceedings, 10transcripts of testimony, report of the hearing officer, and 11orders of the Comptroller shall be in the record of the 12proceeding. The Comptroller shall furnish a transcript of the 13record to any person interested in the hearing upon payment of 14a reasonable fee. 15    Section 140. Subpoenas; depositions; oaths. The 16Comptroller has the power to subpoena documents, books, 17records, or other materials and to bring before it any person 18and to take testimony either orally or by deposition, or both, 19with the same fees and mileage and in the same manner as 20prescribed in civil cases in the courts of this State. The 21Comptroller, the designated hearing officer, or any qualified 22person the Comptroller may designate has the power to 23administer oaths to witnesses at any hearing that the 24Comptroller is authorized to conduct and any other oaths   HB5425 Engrossed- 48 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1authorized in any Act administered by the Comptroller. Every 2person having taken an oath or affirmation in any proceeding 3or matter wherein an oath is required by this Act, who shall 4swear willfully, corruptly, and falsely in a matter material 5to the issue or point in question, or shall suborn any other 6person to swear as aforesaid, shall be guilty of perjury or 7subornation of perjury, as the case may be, and shall be 8punished as provided by State law relative to perjury and 9subornation of perjury. 10    Section 145. Findings and recommendations. At the 11conclusion of the hearing, the hearing officer shall present 12to the Comptroller a written report of its findings of fact, 13conclusions of law, and recommendations. The report shall 14contain a finding whether or not the accused person violated 15this Act or its rules or failed to comply with the conditions 16required in this Act or its rules. The hearing officer shall 17specify the nature of any violation or failure to comply and 18shall make recommendations to the Comptroller. In making 19recommendations for any disciplinary actions, the hearing 20officer may take into consideration all facts and 21circumstances bearing upon the reasonableness of the conduct 22of the accused and the potential for future harm to the public, 23including, but not limited to, previous discipline of the 24accused by the Comptroller, intent, degree of harm to the 25public and likelihood of harm in the future, any restitution   HB5425 Engrossed- 49 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1made by the accused, and whether the incident or incidents 2contained in the complaint appear to be isolated or represent 3a continuing pattern of conduct. In making its recommendations 4for discipline, the hearing officer shall endeavor to ensure 5that the severity of the discipline recommended is reasonably 6related to the severity of the violation. The report of 7findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommendations of 8the hearing officer shall be the basis for the Comptroller's 9order refusing to issue, restore, place on probation, fine, 10suspend, revoke a license, or otherwise discipline a licensee. 11If the Comptroller disagrees with the recommendations of the 12hearing officer, the Comptroller may issue an order in 13contravention of the hearing officer's recommendations. The 14finding is not admissible in evidence against the person in a 15criminal prosecution brought for a violation of this Act, but 16the hearing and finding are not a bar to a criminal prosecution 17brought for a violation of this Act. 18    Section 150. Rehearing. At the conclusion of the hearing, 19a copy of the hearing officer's report shall be served upon the 20applicant or licensee by the Comptroller, either personally or 21as provided in this Act. Within 20 days after service, the 22applicant or licensee may present to the Comptroller a motion 23in writing for a rehearing, which shall specify the particular 24grounds for rehearing. The Comptroller may respond to the 25motion for rehearing within 20 days after its service on the   HB5425 Engrossed- 50 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1Comptroller. If no motion for rehearing is filed, then upon 2the expiration of the time specified for filing such a motion, 3or if a motion for rehearing is denied, then upon denial, the 4Comptroller may enter an order in accordance with 5recommendations of the hearing officer except as provided in 6Section 160. 7    If the applicant or licensee orders from the reporting 8service and pays for a transcript of the record within the 920-day period for filing a motion for rehearing, the 20-day 10period within which a motion may be filed shall restart upon 11the delivery of the transcript to the applicant or licensee.  12    Section 155. Comptroller. Whenever the Comptroller 13believes that substantial justice has not been done in the 14revocation, suspension, or refusal to issue or restore a 15license or other discipline of an applicant or licensee, he or 16she may order a rehearing by the same or other hearing 17officers. 18    Section 160. Order or certified copy; prima facie proof. 19An order or certified copy thereof, over the seal of the 20Comptroller and purporting to be signed by the Comptroller, is 21prima facie proof that: 22        (1) the signature is the genuine signature of the 23    Comptroller; 24        (2) the Comptroller is duly appointed and qualified;   HB5425 Engrossed- 51 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    and 2        (3) the hearing officer is qualified to act.  3    Section 165. Civil action and civil penalties. In addition 4to the other penalties and remedies provided in this Act, the 5Comptroller may bring a civil action in the county of 6residence of the licensee or any other person to enjoin any 7violation or threatened violation of this Act. In addition to 8any other penalty provided by law, any person who violates 9this Act shall forfeit and pay a civil penalty to the 10Comptroller in an amount not to exceed $5,000 for each 11violation as determined by the Comptroller. The civil penalty 12shall be assessed by the Comptroller in accordance with the 13provisions of this Act. 14    Any civil penalty shall be paid within 60 days after the 15effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty. The 16order shall constitute a judgment and may be filed and 17execution had thereon in the same manner as any judgment from 18any court of record. All moneys collected under this Section 19shall be deposited with the Comptroller.  20    Section 170. Consent order. At any point in any 21investigation or disciplinary proceedings as provided in this 22Act, both parties may agree to a negotiated consent order. The 23consent order shall be final upon signature of the 24Comptroller.   HB5425 Engrossed- 52 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1    Section 175. Illinois Administrative Procedure Act; 2application. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 3expressly adopted and incorporated in this Act as if all of the 4provisions of that Act were included in this Act, except that 5the provision of paragraph (d) of Section 10-65 of the 6Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, which provides that at 7hearings the licensee has the right to show compliance with 8all lawful requirements for retention or continuation of the 9license, is specifically excluded. For the purpose of this 10Act, the notice required under Section 10-25 of the Illinois 11Administrative Procedure Act is considered sufficient when 12mailed to the address of record. 13    Section 180. Summary suspension of a license. The 14Comptroller may summarily suspend a license of a licensed 15natural organic reduction facility without a hearing and 16simultaneously commence proceedings for a hearing provided for 17in this Act if the Comptroller finds that evidence in the 18Comptroller's possession indicates that the licensee's 19continued practice would constitute an imminent danger to the 20public. If the Comptroller summarily suspends the license of a 21licensed natural organic reduction facility without a hearing, 22a hearing must be commenced within 30 days after the 23suspension has occurred and concluded as expeditiously as 24practical. In the event of a summary suspension, the county   HB5425 Engrossed- 53 -LRB104 19398 AAS 32846 b1coroner or medical examiner responsible for the area where the 2natural organic reduction facility is located shall make 3arrangements to dispose of any bodies in the suspended 4licensee's possession after consulting with the authorizing 5agents for those bodies. 6    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect June 1, 72026.